Ohio, session 136, SB93.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO:
Section 1. It is the intent of the General Assembly to do 7
all of the following: 8
(A) Eliminate each school district's ability to levy 9
property and income taxes; 10
(B) Establish a single statewide property tax and 11
increased state sales tax to fund schools; 12
(C) Eliminate state scholarship programs for primary and 13
secondary students; 14
(D) Establish a school financing system that calculates a 15
statewide amount of per-pupil funding that will be paid to the 16
public or chartered nonpublic school in which a student's family 17
chooses to enroll that student. 18